Washington statutes.
RCW 5.52.070

"Telegraphic copy" or "telegraphic duplicate" defined.

The term "telegraphic copy," or "telegraphic duplicate," whenever used in this chapter, shall be construed to mean any copy of a message, made or prepared for delivery at the office to which said message may have been sent by telegraph.

[Code 1881 s 2362; 1865 p 77 s 21; RRS s 11351.]